Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.030

Exemptions—Practice of religion—Treatment by prayer.

This chapter shall not be construed to interfere in any way with the practice of religion, nor be held to apply to or regulate any kind of treatment by prayer.

[ 1917 c 160 s 12; RRS s 10185. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1917 c 160 s 8, part; RRS s 10181, part, now codified in RCW 18.50.010.]

NOTES:

Gratuitous services exempted: RCW 18.50.010.